Utah statutes.
10-1-308.   Report of tax collections -- Allocation when location of
taxpayer cannot be accurately determined.
(1)  All municipal energy sales and use taxes collected under this part shall
be reported to the commission on forms that accurately identify the
municipality where the taxpayer is located.
(2)  The commission shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to proportionally distribute all taxes
collected if the municipality where the taxpayer is located cannot be
accurately determined.
